Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2943
Rules; Parenting Act Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The State Court Administrator may develop rules to implement the Parenting Act.

(2) The Parenting Act Fund is created. The State Court Administrator, through the Office of Dispute Resolution, approved mediation centers, and court conciliation programs, shall use the fund to carry out the Parenting Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 24;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 66.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.